Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.500

Enterprise services account—Use.

The enterprise services account shall be used by the department for the payment of certain costs, expenses, and charges, as specified in this section, incurred by it in the operation and administration of the department in the rendering of services, the furnishing or supplying of equipment, supplies and materials, and for providing or allocating facilities, including the operation, maintenance, rehabilitation, or furnishings thereof to other agencies, offices, departments, activities, and other entities enumerated in RCW 43.01.090 and including the rendering of services in acquiring real estate under RCW 43.82.010 and the operation and maintenance of public and historic facilities at the state capitol, as defined in RCW 79.24.710. The department shall treat the rendering of services in acquiring real estate and the operation and maintenance of state capitol public and historic facilities as separate operating entities within the account for financial accounting and control.

The schedule of services, facilities, equipment, supplies, materials, maintenance, rehabilitation, furnishings, operations, and administration to be so financed and recovered shall be determined jointly by the director and the director of financial management, in equitable amounts which, together with any other income or appropriation, will provide the department with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during any allotment period.

The director may adopt rules governing the provisions of RCW 43.01.090 and this section and the relationships and procedures between the department and such other entities.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 224; 2005 c 330 s 6; 1998 c 105 s 9; 1994 c 219 s 17; 1982 c 41 s 2; 1979 c 151 s 101; 1971 ex.s. c 159 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.

Findings—Purpose—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.01.090.

Finding—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.88.030.

Effective dates—1982 c 41: See note following RCW 43.82.010.

Agricultural commodity commissions exempt: RCW 15.04.200.

Enterprise services account—Approval of certain changes required: RCW 43.88.350.